Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2426
Power projects; sections applicable.

If the agency intends to engage in the operation of power projects, or the generation or supply of electric energy, the provisions of sections 18-2426 to 18-2434 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 26.